Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-541
Policy; prorating of insurance.

Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide for the prorating of the insurance thereunder with other valid and collectible insurance.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 41, p. 497.